District of Columbia statutes.
47-2883.01

Bonding of persons engaged in home improvement business; definitions.

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized, in connection with the licensing of persons engaged in the home improvement business, whether as principal, agent, salesman, employee, or otherwise, to require the furnishing of bond as a condition to the issuance of such license. For the purposes of this part, the term “home improvement business” means the repair, remodeling, alteration, conversion, or modernization of, or addition to, residential property, all as may be more particularly defined in regulations promulgated by the Council. Such bonding may be required notwithstanding the fact that a person may also be subject to the bonding requirements of any other law.

Sept. 6, 1960, 74 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 86-715, § 1
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
Regulation, modification, or elimination of license requirements, see § 47-2842.
1981 Ed., § 2-501.
1973 Ed., § 2-2301.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(78) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.